Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-158
Program to provide amino acid-based elemental formulas; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a program to provide amino acid-based elemental formulas for the diagnosis and treatment of Immunoglobulin E and non-Immunoglobulin E mediated allergies to multiple food proteins, food-protein-induced enterocolitis syndrome, eosinophilic disorders, and impaired absorption of nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface, functional length, and motility of the gastrointestinal tract, when the ordering physician has issued a written order stating that the amino acid-based elemental formula is medically necessary for the treatment of a disease or disorder. Up to fifty percent of the actual out-of-pocket cost, not to exceed twelve thousand dollars, for amino acid-based elemental formulas shall be available to an individual without fees each twelve-month period. The department shall distribute funds on a first-come, first-served basis. Nothing in this section is deemed to be an entitlement.

Laws 2014, LB254, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 10.